Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,166
Body art; act, how construed.

Nothing in the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act shall be construed to authorize a person performing body art to engage in the practice of medicine and surgery.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,237;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 428.